Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,218
Nebraska Rural Projects Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Nebraska Rural Projects Fund is hereby created. The fund shall receive money from application fees paid under the Nebraska Rural Projects Act and from transfers authorized by the Legislature, grants, private contributions, repayments of matching funds, and all other sources. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Rural Projects Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

(2) Distributions of matching funds shall only be made from the Nebraska Rural Projects Fund in amounts determined pursuant to section 81-12,211.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 24;

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 26;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 41;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 39;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 198.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.